Kentucky, session 2026RS, SB302.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 441.540 is amended to read as follows:
(1) If there exists threatened violence or intense feeling and public indignation against a
person charged with a crime who is[and] in the custody of an officer, and the
Circuit Judge of the county that has jurisdiction of the offense charged is of the
opinion that the person cannot be safely kept in the jail in that county, the Circuit
Judge, with the consent of the Governor, may order the[such] person removed for
safekeeping to the state penitentiary most convenient to the county having
jurisdiction of the offense charged.
(2) In the absence of the Circuit Judge from the county, the District Judge of the county
may exercise the powers conferred by this section upon the Circuit Judge.
(3) The officer who makes the removal shall be entitled to the actual expenses incurred
in making the removal, and the officer[in addition he] shall also receive a fee of
five dollars ($5) per day for himself or herself, and two and one-half dollars ($2.50)
per day each for not more than two (2) guards.
(4) (a) The claim for fees and expenses shall be presented for approval to the Circuit
Court of the county having jurisdiction of the offense; and[. ]
(b) The claimed compensation shall be allowed by the Circuit Judge or District
Judge directing the transfer and paid out of the treasury of the responsible unit
of government.
Page 1 of 1
XXXX 2/27/2026 9:33 AM Jacketed